Tennessee, session 114, HB0989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. By October 1, 2025, the administrative office of the courts shall report to
the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives the number of
persons found guilty of the Class A misdemeanor of, as an employer, dismissing from
employment an employee because of jury service by that employee as described in Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 39-16-514, from January 1, 1990, until January 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0989
003149
- 1 -